District of Columbia statutes.
1-527.01

Vesting under previous District of Columbia retirement program.

For purposes of vesting pursuant to § 1-626.10(b), creditable service with the District for employees whose participation in the District Defined Contribution Plan ceases as a result of the implementation of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 shall include:

(1)

continuous service performed by nonjudicial employees of the District of Columbia courts after September 30, 1997; and

(2)

service performed for a successor employer, including the Department of Justice or the District of Columbia Offender Supervision, Defender, and Courts Services Agency established under § 24-133, that provides services previously performed by the District government.

Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-532, Pub. L. 105-277, § 802(b)
1981 Ed., § 1-627.10a.